Tennessee statutes. Title 34 Guardianship
Part 4

Registration and Recognition of Orders from Another State

34-8-401. Registration of guardianship orders.

If a conservator or guardian has been appointed in another state and a petition for the appointment of a conservator or guardian is not pending in this state, the conservator or guardian appointed in the other state, after giving notice to the appointing court of an intent to register, may register the conservatorship or guardianship order in this state by filing as a foreign judgment in a court, in any appropriate county of this state, certified copies of the order and letters of office.

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.

34-8-402. Effect of registration.

Upon registration of a conservatorship or guardianship or protective order from another state, the guardian or conservator may exercise in this state all powers authorized in the order of appointment except as prohibited under the laws of this state, including maintaining actions and proceedings in this state and, if the guardian or conservator is not a resident of this state, subject to any conditions imposed upon nonresident parties.

A court of this state may grant any relief available under this chapter and other law of this state to enforce a registered order.

Acts 2010, ch. 817, § 1.